hfst/pp-som-lex.txt
! General notes: 
!   It might be better to go with a ton of lexical entries here over coming up with
!   some creative shiny solution, just in the interest of making this readable.

LEXICON Postposition
Obj_Pron ;
Obj_Adp ;
Obj_Adp_Adp ;
Simple ;
Adp_Adp ;
Deictics ;
Misc ; 


! Probably the best thing to do here if this is intended to be used with CG is find a way to separate the fused forms.. 

! basic
! 	ku PP ; ! in
! 	ka PP ; ! from
! 	u  PP ; ! at
! 	la PP ; ! with

LEXICON Simple
u+Adp:u     FINAL "in" ;
ku+Adp:ku   FINAL "from" ;
ka+Adp:ka   FINAL "at" ;
la+Adp:la   FINAL "with" ;

! join with person object pronouns

! 	i			?
! 	ku		?
! 	na		Pl1
! 	ina		?
! 	idin		Pl2


! thus...

!			+ú			+kú			+ká			+lá
! i+		ií			igú			igá			ilá
! ku+		kuú			kugú		kaá			kulá
! na+		noó			nagú		nagá		nalá
! ina+		inoó		inagú		inagá		inalá
! idin+		idiín		idinkú		idinká		idinlá
! la+       loó(???)    lagú		lagá		lalá(???)

															! removing tones for now; all final
LEXICON Obj_Adp
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#u+Adp:ii      FINAL ;			! ií
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#ku+Adp:igu     FINAL ;			! igú
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#ka+Adp:iga     FINAL ;			! igá
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#la+Adp:ila     FINAL ;			! ilá

ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#u+Adp:kuu     FINAL ;			! kuú
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#ku+Adp:kugu   FINAL ;			! kugú
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#ka+Adp:kaa    FINAL ;			! kaá
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#la+Adp:kula   FINAL ;			! kulá

OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp:noo     FINAL ; ! Check these
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ku+Adp:nagu   FINAL ; ! Check these
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ka+Adp:naga   FINAL ; ! Check these
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#la+Adp:nala   FINAL ; ! Check these

! inoó
! inagú
! inagá
! inalá

idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#u+Adp:idiin    FINAL ;			! idiín
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#ku+Adp:idinku   FINAL ;		! idinkú
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#ka+Adp:idinka   FINAL ;		! etc
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#la+Adp:idinla   FINAL ;

! TODO: Check analysis, Sg3 Obj?
la+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3+Obj#u+Adp:loo     FINAL ;			! loó
la+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3+Obj#ku+Adp:lagu   FINAL ;			! lagú
la+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3+Obj#ka+Adp:laga    FINAL ;			! lagá
la+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg3+Obj#la+Adp:lala   FINAL ;			! lalá

! And pronouns can join these preposition clusters

! TODO: read orwin p. 179

! 			+ugú		+ugá		+ulá		+kagá		+kulá		+kalá
! i			iigú		iigá		iilá		igagá		igulá       igalá
! ku		kuugú		kaagá		kuulá		kaagá		kugulá      kaalá
! na		noogú		noogá		noolá		nagagá		nagulá      nagalá
! ina		inoogú		inoogá		inoolá		inagagá		inagulá     inagalá
! idin		idiinkú		idiinká		idiinla		idinkagá	idinkulá    idinkalá

! TODO:
!   		+ugú		+ugá		+ulá		+kagá		+kulá		+kalá
! la		loogú

! See testing/conj_preposition.txt for all of the above.

! Note, using pronominal absolutive forms in the lemma... 
! TODO: finish these
LEXICON Obj_Adp_Adp
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#u+Adp#u+Adp:iigu                  FINAL ;
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#u+Adp#ka+Adp:iiga                 FINAL ;
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#u+Adp#la+Adp:iila                 FINAL ;
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#ka+Adp#ka+Adp:igaga               FINAL ;
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#ku+Adp#la+Adp:igula               FINAL ;
i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#ka+Adp#la+Adp:igala               FINAL ;

ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#u+Adp#u+Adp:kuugu                 FINAL ;
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#u+Adp#ka+Adp:kaaga                FINAL ;
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#u+Adp#la+Adp:kuula                FINAL ;
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#ka+Adp#ka+Adp:kaaga               FINAL ;
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#ku+Adp#la+Adp:kugula              FINAL ;
ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#ka+Adp#la+Adp:kaala               FINAL ;

! TODO: check lemmas, glosses
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#u+Adp:noogu                  FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#ka+Adp:nooga                  FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#la+Adp:noola                  FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ka+Adp#ka+Adp:nagaga                 FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ku+Adp#la+Adp:nagula                 FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ka+Adp#la+Adp:nagala                 FINAL ;

! TODO: check lemmas, glosses
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#u+Adp:inoogu                   FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#ka+Adp:inooga                  FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#u+Adp#la+Adp:inoola                  FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ka+Adp#ka+Adp:inagaga                FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ku+Adp#la+Adp:inagula                FINAL ;
OMG+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1+Obj#ka+Adp#la+Adp:inagala                FINAL ;

! TODO: check lemmas, glosses
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#u+Adp#u+Adp:idiinku                 FINAL ; 
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#u+Adp#ka+Adp:idiinka                 FINAL ; 
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#u+Adp#la+Adp:idiinla                 FINAL ; 
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#ka+Adp#ka+Adp:idinkaga                FINAL ; 
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#ku+Adp#la+Adp:idinkula                FINAL ; 
idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#ka+Adp#la+Adp:idinkala                FINAL ; 


! i+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg1+Obj#:i       Pre_Location ;
! ku+Pron+Ind+Pers+Sg2+Obj#:ku      Pre_Location ;
! +Pers+Obj#:na      Pre_Location ;
! inaga+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl1Incl+Obj#:ina     Pre_Location ;
! idinka+Pron+Ind+Pers+Pl2+Obj#:idin    Pre_Location_VL ;


! Change +Pers to the persons

! LEXICON Pre_Location
! Adp_Adp ;
! Location ;
! 
! LEXICON Pre_Location_VL
! Adp_Adp ; 
! Location_VL ;
! 
! ! Only used for the pronoun conjunct forms
! LEXICON Location_VL
! u+Adp:u    # ;
! ku+Adp:ku   # ;
! ka+Adp:ka   # ;
! la+Adp:la   # ;
! 
! ! Only used for the pronoun conjunct forms
! LEXICON Location
! u+Adp:u    # ;
! ku+Adp:gu   # ;
! ka+Adp:ga   # ;
! la+Adp:la   # ;
! 

! Prepositions also join prepositions

!			ú			kú			ká			lá
! ú			ugú			ugú			ugá			ulá
! kú					kagá		kagá		kulá
! ká								kagá		kalá


LEXICON Adp_Adp
u+Adp#u+Adp:ugu     FINAL ;
u+Adp#gu+Adp:ugu     FINAL ;

ku+Adp#ku+Adp:kaga    FINAL ;

u+Adp#ka+Adp:uga     FINAL ;
ku+Adp#ku+Adp:kaga    FINAL ;
ku+Adp#ka+Adp:kaga    FINAL ;
ka+Adp#ka+Adp:kaga    FINAL ;

u+Adp#la+Adp:ula     FINAL ;
ku+Adp#la+Adp:kula   FINAL ;
ka+Adp#la+Adp:kala   FINAL ;

LEXICON Misc
is+Adp+Refl#ka+Adp:iska		FINAL ;
is+Adp+Refl#ku+Adp:isku		FINAL ;
is+Adp+Refl:is		FINAL ;





! Obj + Adp_Adp work, but no phonological things have been implemented yet.

! These are the indeclinable ones 
! LEXICON PP 
! +Po:0 #; 

! 
! PP ; !Dummy entry

LEXICON Deictics 
soo+PP+Deic:soo		FINAL ;
sii+PP+Deic:sii		FINAL ;
